Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 5.4. Animal Research.

§ 32.1-162.32.
Definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Animal subject” means a dog or a cat.“Medically unnecessary” means not carried out solely for the better health, welfare, or safety of the animal subject.

No funds appropriated, granted, or awarded by the Commonwealth shall be used by any person or entity, public or private, to directly fund medically unnecessary research classified under pain and distress category E by the U.S. Department of Agriculture on animal subjects. For purposes of this section, the direct funding of research shall not include the appropriation, grant, or award of funds for the construction or maintenance of facilities; the purchase or maintenance of general-use equipment; overhead costs; capital improvements; or faculty or employee salaries.

History.

2018, c. 771.